Utah statutes.
53-7-505.   Authority to have reasonable access to inspect facilities and records.

(1)  The state fire marshal, a representative of the state fire marshal, or a local fire enforcement official may conduct inspections to ensure compliance with Section 53-7-504.  The state fire marshal, a representative of the state fire marshal, or a local fire enforcement official may, regarding facilities within this state used in the business of importing, distributing, selling, or storing of lighters:

(a)  have access during reasonable business hours;

(b)  inspect the facilities and any lighters located at the facilities; and

(c)  inspect all business records pertaining to lighter import, distribution, sale, or storage.

(2)  A person engaged in this state in the business of importing, distributing, selling, or storing lighters shall grant the state fire marshal, a representative of the state fire marshal, or a local fire enforcement official reasonable access for conducting inspections under Subsection (1).



Enacted by Chapter 376, 2010 General Session

